Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.150.275

Annual basic education allocation for students in technical colleges.

The basic education allocation, including applicable vocational entitlements and special education program money, generated under this chapter and under state appropriation acts by school districts for students enrolled in a technical college program established by an interlocal agreement under RCW 28B.50.533 shall be allocated in amounts as determined by the superintendent of public instruction to the serving college rather than to the school district, unless the college chooses to continue to receive the allocations through the school districts. This section does not apply to students enrolled in the running start program established in RCW 28A.600.310.

[ 1995 c 77 s 4; 1993 c 223 s 1.]